Utah statutes.
34-34-13.   Damages for denial or deprivation of continuation of employment.

Any person who may be denied employment or be deprived of continuation of his employment in violation of this chapter shall be entitled to recover from such employer and from any other person, firm, corporation or association acting in concert with him by appropriate action in the courts of this state such damages as he may have sustained by reason of such denial or deprivation of employment.

